Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
TRANSFER
SECTION 1.
(1) The duties,  functions and powers of the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission relating to the volunteer database known  as ORVID are imposed upon, trans-
ferred to and vested in the Oregon Department of Emergency Management.
(2) The  department shall adapt and maintain the database in a manner consistent with
section 9 of this 2026 Act.
RECORDS, PROPERTY, EMPLOYEES
SECTION 2. (1) The executive director of the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission
shall:
(a) Deliver to the Oregon Department of Emergency  Management all records and prop-
erty within the jurisdiction of the commission  that relate to the duties, functions and powers
transferred by section 1 of this 2026 Act; and
(b) Transfer to the department those employees engaged primarily in the exercise  of the
duties, functions and powers transferred by section 1 of this 2026 Act.
(2) The Director of the Oregon  Department of Emergency Management shall take pos-
session of the records and property, and  shall take charge of the employees and employ them
in the exercise of the duties, functions and powers transferred by section 1 of this 2026  Act,
without reduction of compensation but subject to change or termination of employment  or
compensation as provided by law.
(3) The Governor shall resolve  any dispute between the commission and the department
relating to  transfers of records, property and employees under this section, and the
Governor’s decision is final.
UNEXPENDED REVENUES
SECTION 3. (1) The unexpended balances of amounts authorized to be expended by the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission for the biennium ending June 30,  2027, from re-
Enrolled House Bill 4033 (HB 4033-B) Page 1
venues dedicated, continuously appropriated, appropriated or otherwise made available for
the purpose of administering and enforcing the duties, functions and powers transferred by
section 1 of this 2026 Act are transferred to and are  available for expenditure by the Oregon
Department of Emergency Management for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the pur-
pose of administering and enforcing the duties,  functions and powers transferred by section
1 of this 2026 Act.
(2) The expenditure classifications, if any, established by Acts authorizing or  limiting
expenditures by the commission remain applicable to  expenditures by the department under
this section.
ACTION, PROCEEDING, PROSECUTION
SECTION 4.
The transfer of duties, functions and  powers to the Oregon Department of
Emergency Management by section 1 of this 2026 Act does not affect any action,  proceeding
or prosecution  involving or with respect to the duties, functions and powers begun before
and pending at the time of the transfer, except that the department is  substituted for the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission in the action, proceeding or prosecution.
LIABILITY, DUTY, OBLIGATION
SECTION 5. (1) Nothing in sections 1 to 4  of this 2026 Act relieves a person of a liability,
duty or obligation  accruing under or with respect to the duties, functions and powers
transferred by section 1 of this 2026 Act. The Oregon Department of Emergency Management
may undertake the collection or enforcement of any such liability, duty or obligation.
(2) The rights and obligations  of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission legally
incurred under contracts, leases and  business transactions executed, entered into or begun
before the operative date of section 1 of this 2026 Act accruing under or with respect to the
duties, functions and powers transferred by section 1 of this 2026 Act are transferred  to the
department. For the purpose of succession to these rights and obligations, the  department
is a continuation of the commission and not a new authority.
RULES
SECTION 6.
Notwithstanding the transfer of duties, functions and powers  by section 1
of this  2026 Act, the rules of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission with respect
to such duties, functions or powers that are in effect on the operative date of  section 1 of
this 2026 Act continue in effect until superseded or  repealed by rules of the Oregon Depart-
ment of Emergency Management. References in the rules of the commission to the  com-
mission or an officer  or employee of the commission are considered to be references to the
department or an officer or employee of the department.
SECTION 7. Whenever, in any uncodified law or resolution of the Legislative  Assembly
or in any rule, document, record  or proceeding authorized by the Legislative Assembly, in
the context of the duties, functions and powers  transferred by section 1 of this 2026 Act,
reference is made to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, or an officer or em-
ployee of the  commission whose duties, functions or powers are transferred by section 1 of
this 2026 Act, the reference is considered to be a  reference to the Oregon Department of
Emergency Management, or an officer or employee of the department who by this 2026  Act
is charged with carrying out the duties, functions and powers.
OPERATIVE DATE
Enrolled House Bill 4033 (HB 4033-B) Page 2
SECTION 8. (1) The Director of the Oregon Department of Emergency  Management shall
notify the standing  or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly and the Legislative
Counsel when the transfer described in section 1 of this 2026 Act is complete.
(2) Sections  1 to 7 of this 2026 Act become operative on the day after the date the no-
tifications described in subsection (1) of this section are complete.
DUTIES OF OREGON DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT
SECTION 9. (1) The Oregon Department of Emergency Management shall maintain a
statewide registry of persons who are willing and able to volunteer to perform  emergency
service activities, as defined in ORS 401.358. The registry may include:
(a) Qualified emergency service volunteers, as defined in ORS 401.358;
(b) Persons registered as volunteers with a local government,  as defined in ORS 174.116,
or a tribal entity, including members of community emergency  response teams and neigh-
borhood emergency teams;
(c) Persons experienced in construction or other skilled trades;
(d) Persons certified by  the State Fire Marshal as building evaluators under the Oregon
Safety Assessment Program established under ORS 401.256; and
(e) Other persons  that the department determines are able to assist in emergency re-
sponse and recovery.
(2) As a condition of inclusion on the registry, the department may require:
(a) Evidence of relevant qualifications; and
(b) Training related to emergency response and recovery, including incident  management
or command.
(3) The registry must include, for each person:
(a) The person’s name and contact information;
(b) The physical location where the person is based; and
(c) Specialized training or skills related to emergency response and recovery that  the
person has.
(4) The registry must be accessible to emergency  management agencies and emergency
program managers described in ORS 401.305. The department may make the registry ac-
cessible to any  other persons or entities if the department determines that providing such
access will enhance public safety.
(5) The department is authorized to issue  badges to volunteers listed in the registry that
describe a volunteer’s skills, training, licenses, certifications or other information  relevant
to the performance of emergency service activities.
FISCAL PROVISION
SECTION 10.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to  the Oregon Department of Emergency Management by section 1 (2), chapter 423,
Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for Preparedness  and Response, is
increased by $32,600, to carry out the provisions of sections 1 and 9 of this 2026 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 11. The unit captions  used in this 2026 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2026 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
Enrolled House Bill 4033 (HB 4033-B) Page 3
SECTION 12. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 3, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4033 (HB 4033-B) Page 4